Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1543.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; DYSLEXIA.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Department of Education. new text end new text begin The sums indicated in this section are appropriated from the general fund to the Department of Education in the fiscal years designated. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Dyslexia Institute of Minnesota. new text end new text begin (a) For a grant to the Dyslexia Institute of Minnesota to provide free evidence-based literacy interventions to students who are reading below grade level and are enrolled in public schools where a majority of students are eligible for free or reduced-price meals: new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 450,000 new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 450,000 new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2027 new text end new text begin (b) Grant funds must be used to support tutor training and compensation, curricular materials, program delivery, and program administration. new text end new text begin (c) The Dyslexia Institute of Minnesota must provide a detailed report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees having jurisdiction over kindergarten through grade 12 education and higher education by January 15 of each year until 2028 describing how grant funds were used, and progress made toward improving the literacy proficiency of participating students. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2025. new text end